Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.185

Guardian ad litem, special advocate, or investigator—Release of information.

A guardian ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, or investigator under this title appointed under this chapter may release confidential information, records, and reports to the office of the family and children's ombuds for the purposes of carrying out its duties under chapter 43.06A RCW.

[ 2013 c 23 s 41; 2000 c 124 s 9; 1999 c 390 s 4.]